Massachusetts, session 194th, H4464.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be
established, pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws, a special legislative
commission known as the Commission on the Preservation and Storage of Evidence. The
commission shall be comprised of the following 15 members: 6 members appointed by the
governor, 1 of whom shall be an elected clerk of the superior court; 1 of whom shall be a clerk-
magistrate of the district court; 1 of whom shall be a police officer with experience in evidence
collection and preservation; 1 of whom shall be a criminal defense attorney;1 of whom shall be
professor of evidence at a law school accredited by the American Bar Association and 1 of
whom shall be a retired district court or boston municipal court justice; 3 members of the house
of representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house, 1 of whom shall be
the house chair of the joint committee on the judiciary or designee and 1 of whom shall be
appointed by the minority leader; 3 members of the senate, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the
senate president, 1 of whom shall be the senate chair of the joint committee on the judiciary or
designee and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; the attorney general or a
of 3

designee and 2 elected district attorneys appointed by the president of the Massachusetts District
Attorneys Association. The house and senate chairs of the joint committee on the judiciary or
their designees shall serve as co-chairs of the commission.
The commission shall conduct an examination of: (i) the existing legal and regulatory
framework governing the preservation and storage of evidence and property collected by law
enforcement; (ii) the current processes utilized by law enforcement for the preservation and
storage of evidence and property including its submission, receipt, storage, disposition and use as
part of court proceedings; and (iii) the current processes utilized by law enforcement for the
storage of hazardous material; the protection and preservation of biological or DNA-related
material; the adoption of security and chain of custody protocols; and the training of evidence or
property personnel.
The commission shall investigate the feasibility and anticipated cost of constructing and
maintaining a statewide evidence storage facility for the preservation and storage of evidence
and property.
In undertaking its examinations and investigations the commission shall confer with
representatives of the various state offices responsible for overseeing evidence collection and
storage, as well as with academics, practitioners and others with expertise in these areas.
The commission shall file a report on all aspects of its examination and investigation with
the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and the
clerks of the house of representatives and senate regarding the results of its investigation and
study on or before March 31, 2026.
of 3

The report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) an assessment of the effectiveness and
sufficiency of current law and processes for evidence and property collection and storage
including those used for hazardous material storage, the protection and preservation of
biological/DNA-related material, security and chain of custody, and the training of
evidence/property personnel; (ii) recommendations for improvement of these processes for use in
their development of standardized guidelines for evidence and property management by law
enforcement; (ii) recommendations on the feasibility and anticipated cost of constructing and
maintaining a statewide evidence storage facility and evidence management program; and (iv)
recommendations for improvements or amendments to any law, regulation or rule involving
evidence or property collection and preservation including recommended legislation, if any.
of 3